Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Chapter 1

Chief and District Mine Inspectors

59-1-101. Owners and operators to make annual statistical reports — Inspection of books.

Every owner or operator engaged in mining, quarrying, or production of coal, cobalt, copper, fluorspar, gold, iron ores, lead, zinc, manganese, natural and other gas, petroleum, phosphate rock, platinum, silver, marble and other stone, gypsum, ocher, pyrites, clay products, slate or other minerals, or engaged in the manufacture of coke, coal tar, gas, pig iron, ammonium sulphate, gas coke, Portland and other natural cements and all other by-products of any other mineral produced in this state, shall on or before February 15 of each year make out and send to the department of labor and workforce development on a form prescribed by the division a detailed annual report giving statistics and information concerning the output of mines or plants or other business, the tonnage or man hours for mines that do not measure tons mined, number of employees, and the estimated number of days worked.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person to fail or refuse to furnish the department any and all information called for in the annual report as above provided for each day of delay, any fine to go to this state. It is the duty of the commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner's designated representative to report such failure to the district attorney general of the district where the mine, quarry, plant, or other work is situated; and in the event of the failure to furnish such information, it shall be the duty of the commissioner or the commissioner's designated representative to call upon such persons and inspect such books and records as will give the information above provided for; and such person shall be required to permit examination of all necessary books or records.

Acts 1915, ch. 169, § 7; Shan., § 3079a78; Code 1932, § 5562; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-113; Acts 1985, ch. 288, §§ 43-47; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1999, ch. 520, § 43; 2016, ch. 599, § 7; 2017, ch. 356, § 1; T.C.A. §59-1-113.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-1-113 to §59-1-101 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 599, § 7, provided that references to the elevator division, division of mines, labor standards division, and division of boiler and elevator inspection, are to be changed to the department of labor and workforce development as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

59-1-102. False statements in statistical reports — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person required to furnish statistical reports to any state department to knowingly and willfully make a false statement in any detail of such reports.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1953, ch. 86, §§ 94, 95 (Williams, §§ 5638.94, 5638.95); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 58-114; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A. §59-1-114.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-1-114 to §59-1-102 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

59-1-103. Annual license required for mine operation — Posting.

The owner or operator of each mine shall procure from the department of labor and workforce development a license to operate a mine, and the license shall not be transferable. Any person who assumes control of a mine, opens a new mine, or reopens an abandoned mine shall procure a license to operate the mine before mining operations are begun. All licenses are valid for one (1) year from the date of issuance and shall be renewed annually.

The license shall be in such printed form as the department of labor and workforce development may prescribe and when issued shall be kept posted at a conspicuous place near the main entrance of the mine.

Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 3; T.C.A., § 58-115; Acts 1985, ch. 288, § 2; 1986, ch. 557, § 1; 1999, ch. 520, § 43; 2016, ch. 599, § 7; T.C.A. §59-1-115.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-1-115 to §59-1-103 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 599, § 7, provided that references to the elevator division, division of mines, labor standards division, and division of boiler and elevator inspection, are to be changed to the department of labor and workforce development as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

59-1-104. License — Fee.

Requests for such license shall be made to the department of labor and workforce development, giving name and address and such requests shall be accompanied by a post office money order or cashier's or certified check drawn in favor of the state treasurer in the amount of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each surface coal or metal mine and five hundred dollars ($500) for each underground coal or metal mine. All funds derived from this section shall be expendable receipts of the department, shall be in addition to the appropriations made to the department by the general assembly, and shall not revert to the general fund at the end of a fiscal year or biennium.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the commissioner of labor and workforce development shall increase the amount of the license fees charged under this section to the extent necessary to offset the reduction of the department's appropriation for mine licensing operations under the general appropriations act for fiscal year 2000-2001.

Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 3; 1957, ch. 253, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 458, § 1; 1979, ch. 368, § 7; T.C.A., § 58-116; Acts 1985, ch. 288, §§ 3, 4; 1999, ch. 520, § 43; 2000, ch. 983, § 3; 2005, ch. 407, § 3; 2016, ch. 599, § 7; T.C.A. §59-1-116.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-1-116 to §59-1-104 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Compiler’s Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 599, § 7, provided that references to the elevator division, division of mines, labor standards division, and division of boiler and elevator inspection, are to be changed to the department of labor and workforce development as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

59-1-105. Failure to obtain license.

Any owner or operator operating a mine and who fails to obtain a license as required by §§59-1-103 and59-1-104 shall forfeit the right to operate a mine in this state, and the commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner's designated agent shall have the authority to close the mine until the license is obtained as provided for by those sections.

Acts 1955, ch. 238, § 3; T.C.A., § 58-117; Acts 1985, ch. 288, § 5; 1999, ch. 520, § 43; T.C.A. §59-1-117.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §59-1-117 to §59-1-105 by authority of the Code Commission in 2018.

Chapters 2, 3

[Reserved]